Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF646.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1586HV (1) 91 sb/js H.F. 646 Section 1. Section 483A.8C, subsection 1, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 1. A nonambulatory person who is a resident may be issued 3 one any sex deer hunting license to hunt deer with a shotgun, 4 muzzleloading rifle, or any handgun or rifle described in 5 section 481A.48 during any established firearm deer hunting 6 season. If the tag is filled during one of the seasons, the 7 license will not be valid in subsequent seasons. A person who 8 applies for a license pursuant to this section shall complete 9 a form, as required by rule, that is signed by a physician who 10 verifies that the person is nonambulatory. 11